Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.175

Discrimination prohibited—State agencies and subdivisions—Officials and employees.

The state and its political subdivisions, and all officials, agents, employees, or representatives thereof, are prohibited from in any way discriminating against licensed optometrists in performing and receiving compensation for services covered by their licenses.

[ 1973 c 48 s 3.]